Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. Tombigbee Valley Authority.

§ 51-13-1.
Membership and organization of board.

There is hereby created the Tombigbee Valley Authority composed of Clay, Itawamba, Lee, Lowndes, Monroe, Noxubee, Prentiss, Pontotoc, Alcorn, and Tishomingo Counties in the State of Mississippi, to be governed by a board consisting of one member from each such county and three members from the state at large, all to be appointed by the governor to serve for a term of four years or until their successors are appointed and qualified. The governor shall designate in his appointment the chairman and vice-chairman thereof. They shall serve without pay except for their actual traveling expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, to be reimbursed as in the case of state employees under the provisions of general law. Upon appointment, said members shall meet and organize at Columbus, Mississippi, set a regular time and place for the meetings of the authority, secure offices and all necessary equipment, and obtain such engineering, professional, clerical, and other assistance as may be necessary in order to accomplish the purposes of this article. An executive director may be appointed by the board if this is deemed advisable, and salaries of all personnel may be paid out of funds provided under the terms of this article in an amount agreeable to the authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-42; Laws, 1956, ch. 171, §§ 1-5.

§ 51-13-3.
Powers and duties.

The Tombigbee Valley Authority is hereby authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary or desirable in making a survey or surveys of that portion of the Tombigbee River situated in the State of Mississippi and its tributaries to investigate the possibilities of developing that portion of the Tombigbee River lying and being in Mississippi, which comprises a segment from the Tennessee River on the north through the States of Mississippi and Alabama to the Gulf of Mexico at Mobile, Alabama, in co-operation with the federal government and any and all agencies thereof assisting in such survey or proposed plans for projects which upon completion would lead to the industrial development of this state, to the opening of an additional inland waterway to the Gulf of Mexico, and to the control of the flood waters of the Tombigbee River in Mississippi. It is contemplated that plans be considered and surveys made for the opening of a water route from the northern headwaters of the Tombigbee River, and particularly the east branch of the Tombigbee River, its tributaries, and the Tennessee River as a part of the over-all plans to be considered by this authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-42; Laws, 1956, ch. 171, §§ 1-5.

§ 51-13-5.
Financing.

The authority shall be financed in all of its activities from funds made available by each of the associated counties, and each such county is authorized and empowered to contribute any amount or amounts which the board of supervisors thereof shall deem advisable, acting in their sole discretion, to be paid from the general county fund of the respective counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-42; Laws, 1956, ch. 171, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 34, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 51-13-7.
Homestead exemption laws not applicable.

No reimbursement on the additional tax levies herein provided shall be made under the Homestead Exemption Law of 1946, being Sections 27-33-1 through 27-33-61 of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-42; Laws, 1956, ch. 171, §§ 1-5.

§ 51-13-9.
Article supplementary to other laws.

This article shall be considered supplemental and additional to any and all other laws and confers sufficient authority in and of itself for the purposes set forth herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-42; Laws, 1956, ch. 171, §§ 1-5.